Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB324.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1715. Distribution of unofficial mail-in form.(a) Offense defined.--A person may not distribute an unofficial mail-in form to a qualified elector.(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) does not apply to a document that:(1) is designed for the purpose of providing information on how to obtain an application for an absentee ballot, mail-in ballot or application for an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot;(2) does not include a return mailing address;(3) clearly and conspicuously states at the top of the 12345678910111213141516171819 document that the document is an unofficial document;(4) identifies the person distributing the document; and(5) does not use stationery mimicking that of an elected official, the department or county election board, or an authorized agent of the department or county election board.(c) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be subject to pay a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $2,500.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "unofficial mail-in form" means any of the following:(1) An application for an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot for use by an elector in a general election, primary election or special election in this Commonwealth that has not been issued under law by the department or a county election board, or an authorized agent of the department or county election board.(2) An absentee ballot or mail-in ballot for use by an elector in a general election, primary election or special election in this Commonwealth that has not been issued under law by the department or a county election board, or an authorized agent of the department or county election board.(3) An application for an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, or an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, printed on stationery mimicking that of an elected official, the department or a county election board, or an authorized agent of the department or county election board.(4) An application for an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, or an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, mailed in an envelope mimicking that of an elected official, the 20250SB0324PN0255 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department or a county election board, or an authorized agent of the department or county election board.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0324PN0255 - 3 - 123